New Jersey, session 222, A4640.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section) The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     According to a New York Times article published in August 2025, a major transportation network company (TNC) operating in the State received approximately 400,181 complaints alleging sexual assault or sexual misconduct in the United States between 2017 and 2022.  Notably, the TNC indicated that the majority of the complaints were made by female drivers and riders against male drivers and riders who have low ratings and prior histories of sexual misconduct, with most of the assaults occurring during prearranged rides originating near bars late at night and on weekends. b.    As there is no federal requirement for TNCs to collect data on the number of physical or sexual assaults, the exact number of assaults committed against drivers and riders in New Jersey and across the United States remains unknown.  However, the United States Government Accountability Office has cautioned that the total number of assaults may be greater than the current estimates due to the underreporting of assaults and, in particular, sexual assaults. c.     Safety concerns among TNC riders and drivers are becoming increasingly widespread, with a growing number of reports of riders interactions with unauthorized drivers posing as TNC drivers and between 35 to 79 percent of surveyed TNC drivers reporting feeling unsafe while working. d.    Additional safety measures are needed to address the security risks and mounting safety concerns among TNC riders and drivers.  Therefore, it is the obligation of the Legislature to promote the health, safety, and welfare of New Jersey residents by strengthening current TNC safety laws and enacting additional comprehensive safety requirements for TNCs operating in this State. 2.    Section 2 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-1 et seq.): Applicant means a person who applies to a transportation network company to be a transportation network company driver. Authorized driver profile means a transportation network company drivers unique user profile on a transportation network companys digital network, which profile displays the drivers name and other identifying information and is authorized by the transportation network company for the purpose of providing prearranged rides. Chief Administrator means the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. Commission means the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. Digital network means any online-enabled technology application, service, website, or system offered or utilized by a transportation network company that enables the prearrangement of rides between transportation network company riders and transportation network company drivers. Division means the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety. Machine-readable code or image means an optical label that can be scanned using a special scanner or a personal mobile device with a built-in camera. Personal vehicle means a motor vehicle that is used by a transportation network company driver to provide prearranged rides and is owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for use by the transportation network company driver.  A personal vehicle shall not be considered:  an autocab or taxi, as defined in R.S.48:16-1[,] ; a limousine, as defined in R.S.48:16-13 or section 2 of P.L.1997, c.356 (C.48:16-13.1)[,] ; an autobus or jitney, as defined in R.S.48:16-23[,] a motor bus, as defined in section 1 of P.L.1991, c.154 (C.17:28-1.5)[,] ; or any other for-hire vehicle.  A personal vehicle shall not be considered an automobile, as defined in subsection a. of section 2 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-2), while a transportation network company driver is providing a prearranged ride. Prearranged ride means the provision of transportation by a transportation network company driver to a transportation network company rider, beginning when a driver accepts a ride requested by a rider through a digital network controlled by a transportation network company, continuing while the driver transports a requesting rider, and ending when the last requesting rider departs from the personal vehicle.  A prearranged ride shall not include transportation provided using an autocab, taxi, limousine, autobus, jitney, motor bus, or other for-hire vehicle.  A prearranged ride shall not include ridesharing, as defined in R.S.39:1-1. Transportation network company means a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other entity that is registered as a business in the State or operates in this State, and uses a digital network to connect a transportation network company rider to a transportation network company driver to provide a prearranged ride.  A transportation network company shall not include an individual, corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other entity arranging non-emergency medical transportation for individuals qualifying for Medicaid under P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) or Medicare under Pub.L.89-97 (42 U.S.C. s.1395 et seq.) pursuant to a contract with the State or a managed care organization, whereby Medicaid or Medicare funding is used to pay for the non-emergency medical transportation services. Transportation network company driver or driver means a person who receives connections to potential riders and related services from a transportation network company in exchange for payment of a fee to the transportation network company, and who uses a personal vehicle to offer or provide a prearranged ride to a rider upon connection through [a digital network controlled by a transportation network company] an authorized driver profile in return for compensation or payment of a fee. Transportation network company rider or rider means a person who uses a transportation network companys digital network to connect with a transportation network company driver to receive a prearranged ride from the driver using the drivers personal vehicle. (cf:  P.L.2019, c.128, s.1) 3.    Section 20 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-20) is amended to read as follows: 20.  An applicant or driver shall be prohibited from utilizing the transportation network companys digital network as a transportation network company driver or from providing a prearranged ride [as a transportation network company driver] if: a.     [The] the applicant or driver has been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo contendere to one or more of the following crimes: (1)   [In] in New Jersey[, any crime as follows]: aggravated assault[,] ; arson[,] ; burglary[,] ; escape[,] ; extortion[,] ; homicide[,] ; kidnapping[,] ; robbery[,] ; aggravated sexual assault[,] ; sexual assault[,] ; or endangering the welfare of a child pursuant to N.J.S.2C:24-4, whether or not armed with or having possession of any weapon enumerated in subsection r. of N.J.S.2C:39-1[,] ; human trafficking pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2005, c.77 (C.2C:13-8), or any crime involving an act or practice of one or more of the severe forms of trafficking in persons as described in paragraph (11) of 22 U.S.C. [S.7102] s.7102, the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000[,] ; a crime pursuant to the provisions of N.J.S.2C:39-3, N.J.S.2C:39-4, or N.J.S.2C:39-9[, or other than a disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offense for] ; the unlawful use, possession, or sale of a controlled dangerous substance, as defined in N.J.S.2C:35-2[.] , other than a disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offense; an indictable offense involving fraud; theft of property under N.J.S.2C:20-1 et al.; domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19); harassment pursuant to N.J.S.2C:33-4; or stalking pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1992, c.209 (C.2C:12-10); or (2)   [In] in any other state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, as a result of a conviction, a guilty plea, or a plea of nolo contendere in a court of competent jurisdiction, a crime which in that other jurisdiction is comparable to one of the crimes enumerated in paragraph (1) of this subsection. If an applicant or driver who has been convicted of one of the crimes enumerated in paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection produces a valid certificate of rehabilitation issued pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2007, c.327 (C.2A:168A-8) or, if the criminal offense occurred outside the State, an equivalent certificate from the jurisdiction where the criminal offense occurred, the criminal offense shall not disqualify the applicant or driver from accessing the transportation network companys digital network as a transportation network company driver or from providing prearranged rides [as a transportation network company driver, except that] .  However, this provision shall not apply to an applicant or driver who has been convicted of human trafficking pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2005, c.77 (C.2C:13-8), any crime involving an act or practice of one or more of the severe forms of trafficking in persons as described in paragraph (11) of 22 U.S.C. [S.7102] s.7102, the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000, or a comparable crime in another jurisdiction.  A transportation network company, or a third party designated by the transportation network company, shall take reasonable measures to confirm the validity of the certificate, such as contacting the relevant court or government agency; b.    [The] the applicants or drivers driving record check reveals more than three moving violations in the prior three-year period, or one of the following violations in the prior three-year period: (1)   driving under the influence pursuant to R.S.39:4-50; (2)   resisting arrest; eluding an officer pursuant to N.J.S.2C:29-2; (3)   reckless driving pursuant to R.S.39:4-96; (4)   driving with a suspended or revoked license pursuant to R.S.39:3-40; or (5)   a violation committed in any other state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States that is comparable to one of the violations enumerated in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this subsection; c.     [The] the applicant or driver is a match in the United States Department of Justices Dru Sjodin National Sex Offender Public Website; d.    [The] the applicant or driver is not a holder of a valid basic driver's license; e.     [The] the applicant or driver does not possess proof of valid vehicle registration for the drivers personal vehicle to be used to provide prearranged rides; f.     [The] the applicant or driver does not possess proof of valid automobile liability insurance for the personal vehicle; [or] g.    [The] the applicant or driver is under 21 years of age; or h.    the applicant or driver allows an unauthorized individual to drive for a transportation network company under the applicants or drivers authorized driver profile or uses another individuals authorized driver profile to accept a prearranged ride for a transportation network company. (cf:  P.L.2022, c.11. s.2) 4.    (New section) a.  An applicant or driver who has been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo contendere to an offense listed in paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection a. of section 20 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-20) shall notify the transportation network company within 48 hours after the conviction was pronounced or plea was entered. b.    Each transportation network company shall create a procedure by which: (1)   an applicant or driver shall notify the transportation network company of a conviction, in writing; and (2)   the transportation network company shall acknowledge receipt of the notification received pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 5.    (New section) a.  A transportation network company shall establish and implement a zero tolerance policy on the following crimes against drivers and riders: (1)   simple assault or aggravated assault; (2)   sexual assault or aggravated sexual assault; (3)   kidnapping; (4)   robbery; and (5)   homicide. A transportation network company shall post the zero tolerance policy on its Internet website and digital network. b.    A transportation network company shall develop a procedure for investigating a complaint filed against a driver or rider with the transportation network company or the commission, or through contact by the commission, the Office of the Attorney General, a district attorneys office, or law enforcement agency alleging a violation of the zero tolerance policy established by subsection a. of this section. c.     Within seven business days after receiving the complaint, the transportation network company shall conduct a good faith investigation into the complaint, in accordance with the procedure established pursuant to subsection b. of this section.  If the results of the investigation corroborate the allegations set forth in the complaint, the transportation network company shall revoke the drivers or riders access to the digital network within 24 hours of completing the investigation.  The transportation network company shall provide the driver or rider with written notice that the drivers or riders access to the digital network has been revoked within 24 hours of the revocation. d.    A driver or rider may challenge the transportation network companys decision to revoke the drivers or riders access to the digital network by submitting a written request for reconsideration to the transportation network company within 30 calendar days after receiving the written notice pursuant to subsection c. of this section. A transportation network company shall decide the drivers or riders request for reconsideration within 14 calendar days after receiving the written request.  However, the transportation network company may notify the driver or rider, in writing, of a continuance of the reconsideration if: (1)   the driver or rider has not provided sufficient evidence or documentation for consideration by the transportation network company; or (2)   circumstances outside of the transportation network companys control necessitate additional time to reconsider the drivers request for reconsideration. e.     The transportation network companys resolution of a drivers or riders request for reconsideration shall include a written statement that the transportation network company sends the driver or rider via mail and electronic mail or through another mechanism that the transportation network company reasonably expects will remain accessible to the driver or rider for at least one year. The written statement shall include a determination: (1)   affirming the transportation network companys decision, including a summary of the reasons for revoking the drivers or riders access to the digital network; or (2)   that the driver or rider did not violate the transportation network companys zero tolerance policy established pursuant to subsection a. of this section, which determination shall be accompanied by restoration of the drivers or riders access to the digital network within 24 hours of rendering the determination. The transportation network companys resolution of the drivers or riders request for reconsideration shall include the option for the party that filed a complaint alleging a violation of the transportation network companys zero tolerance policy, established pursuant to subsection a. of this section, to opt in to receive updates that the transportation network company sends via mail and electronic mail detailing the disposition of the request for reconsideration. f.     A driver or rider may initiate a civil proceeding in a district court against the transportation network company, driver, or rider if the driver or rider has a claim for damages suffered because of an alleged violation of this section by a transportation network company, a driver, or a rider, which alleged violation resulted in the death, sexual assault, kidnapping, or personal injury of the driver or rider. 6.    (New section) a.  As used in this section, biometric data means the same as that term is defined in P.L.2023, c.266 (C.56:8-166.4). b.    After a driver accepts a prearranged ride through a digital network, but before the driver picks up the rider, a transportation network company shall verify that the driver providing the prearranged ride is the same driver authorized by the transportation network company to provide the prearranged ride through: (1)   an in-vehicle dashboard camera; (2)   a live self-identification photograph or video; (3)   biometric verification by fingerprint or optical scan; or (4)   another verification method. c.     A transportation network company shall not collect biometric data from a driver or rider without first obtaining the consent of the driver or rider. 7.    (New section) a.  Each prearranged ride shall be audio recorded beginning from when the driver picks up the rider in a personal vehicle and continuing until the rider departs from the personal vehicle.  In addition to the audio recording, each driver and rider may elect to have the prearranged ride video recorded. b.    A transportation network company shall be responsible for providing its drivers with the necessary audio and video recording equipment and maintaining the equipment, as needed. c.     A driver shall display a sign in a conspicuous manner on the interior of the drivers personal vehicle, which sign shall indicate that the prearranged ride is being audio recorded and, if applicable, video recorded. d.    Each transportation network company shall: (1)   establish a policy and procedure by which a driver and a rider shall consent to having a prearranged ride continuously audio recorded and, if a driver or rider elects, video recorded, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, as a condition of providing or receiving a prearranged ride; and (2)   ensure that no rider is charged a fee or increased cost for a prearranged ride that is recorded pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 8.    Section 25 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-25) is amended to read as follows: 25.  a.  Notwithstanding any [other provision of] law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a transportation network company shall maintain the following records: (1)   individual prearranged ride records, including the audio and video recordings captured pursuant to subsection a. of section 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), for at least six years following the date of the prearranged ride; and (2)   individual records of each transportation network company driver, including, but not limited to, any records provided to the transportation network company pursuant to sections 16 through 19 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-16 through C.39:5H-19), for at least five years after the driver terminates status as a transportation network company driver. b.    (1) The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission or the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety may inspect records held by the transportation network company that are necessary to investigate and resolve a specific complaint filed against a transportation network company driver if the commission or division provides a written request for the records and a basis for the request.  A record provided to the commission or division pursuant to this section may exclude information that tends to identify specific drivers or transportation network company riders, unless the identity of the driver or rider is relevant to the complaint. (2)   If a person files a complaint against a transportation network company or driver, the transportation network company shall respond to a subpoena or search warrant for information related to the complaint from a court, the Office of the Attorney General, a district attorneys office, the commission, or a law enforcement agency no later than two business days after the request is made, unless otherwise agreed upon by the subpoenaing party. c.     The commission or division may require transportation network company records maintained in-State or out-of-State to be available to the commission or division within 14 business days of the commissions or divisions request to inspect records to investigate and resolve a complaint pursuant to subsection b. of this section. The transportation network company may request an extension if the [14 business] 14-business day deadline imposes an undue burden upon the transportation network company. In the event of exigent circumstances, the commission or division may require a transportation network company to make its records available before 14 business days from the time of the commissions or divisions request if receipt of the records before 14 business days is reasonably necessary under the circumstances for the investigation or resolution of a complaint pursuant to subsection b. of this section. d.    For the purpose of verifying that a transportation network company is in compliance with the requirements of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-1 et seq.) or to assure the integrity and performance of a transportation network company or a transportation network company driver, the commission, division, or an authorized representative may inspect transportation network company records, including all books, records, documents, papers, reports, or data relating to the operation of a transportation network company, in whatever form kept, including, but not limited to, records required to be maintained by a transportation network company pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  The inspection shall take place at a mutually agreed upon location in the State.  Any record provided to the commission, division, or authorized representative may exclude information that tends to identify specific drivers or riders. e.     Any records inspected by the commission, division, or authorized representative under this section[,] shall be deemed confidential, shall not be disclosed to a third party except with the prior written consent of the transportation network company, and shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to government records.  Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the applicability of any other exemptions under P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) or P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.). f.     A transportation network companys failure to comply with the provisions of this section or permit the commission or division on the transportation network companys premises during regular business hours to conduct investigations or reviews shall be cause for suspension or revocation of the permit issued by the commission to operate as a transportation network company pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-4), or any other fine, penalty, or enforcement action as determined by the commission or division.  The commissions or divisions investigation or review of the transportation network company may include, but shall not be limited to, discussions with customers and transportation network company drivers, examination of motor vehicle records, questioning of employees, and the use of other investigatory techniques as may be necessary [for the enforcement of] to enforce this section and the regulations adopted by the commission or division. g.    The commission and division shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to effectuate the authority granted to the commission and division pursuant to this section. h.    A transportation network company shall process the data collected or maintained pursuant to this section in accordance with P.L.2023, c.266 (C.56:8-166.4 et seq.). (cf:  P.L.2017, c.26, s.25) 9.    (New section) a.  A transportation network company shall not: (1)   alter the rating that a rider assigned a driver or the rating that a driver assigned a rider on a transportation network companys digital network; (2)   assign an automatic or default driver rating that the rider did not assign; or (3)   assign an automatic or default rider rating that the driver did not assign. b.    Notwithstanding subsection a. of this section, a transportation network company may delete ratings or reviews that are motivated by bias or fraud, as determined by the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety.  A transportation network company shall not consider negative ratings or reviews that are motivated by bias or fraud while investigating a complaint pursuant to subsection c. of section 5 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) or deciding a request for reconsideration pursuant to subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 10.  (New section) a.  Each transportation network company shall prohibit a driver or rider from offering, selling, or otherwise providing food or beverage to another driver or rider. b.    The commission may conduct randomized compliance checks to ensure that a transportation network company is in compliance with subsection a. of this section. 11.  (New section) a.  Within three months after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), each transportation network company shall develop policies to: (1)   prevent the creation of unauthorized driver profiles, detect and deactivate unauthorized driver profiles already formed, and prevent account sharing and account renting; (2)   prevent crimes committed by or against a driver; (3)   prohibit the transportation of an unaccompanied minor unless the minor is part of a duly authorized family account whereby a parent or guardian is required to be present when the minor confirms authorization for the prearranged ride or enters the personal vehicle; (4)   permit a driver to refuse a prearranged ride to an individual who is not authorized to use the account requesting the prearranged ride, which policy shall ensure that the driver is not penalized by the transportation network company for refusing the prearranged ride; and (5)   notify riders and drivers of any updates to the transportation network companys safety policies. b.    Each transportation network company shall provide copies of the policies created pursuant to subsection a. of this section to the commission, the Attorney General, and every driver who provides prearranged rides for the transportation network companys digital network. c.     Within 10 business days after updating a policy established pursuant to subsection a. of this section, each transportation network company shall provide a copy of the updated policy to the commission, the Attorney General, and every driver who provides prearranged rides for the transportation network companys digital network. 12.  (New section) A provision in a contract between a transportation network company and a driver or rider shall be void as against public policy if the provision: a.     attempts to immunize the transportation network company from a civil penalty established pursuant to the Transportation Network Company Safety and Regulatory Act, P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-1 et seq.); b.    attempts to waive or waives a right or protection established pursuant to the Transportation Network Company Safety and Regulatory Act, P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-1 et seq.) or P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.); c.     attempts to waive or waives the right to a jury trial for a claim involving sexual misconduct or sexual assault; or d.    contains a mandatory arbitration clause that limits the rights of a driver or rider to seek judicial relief for a claim involving sexual misconduct or sexual assault. 13.  (New section) a. Beginning one year after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), each transportation network company shall submit an annual report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature. b.    At a minimum, the report required pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall include the number of: (1)   reported safety incidents involving a driver who provided prearranged rides for, or a rider who received prearranged rides from, the transportation network company in the preceding calendar year, including the number of reported instances of: (a)   physical assaults; (b)   sexual assaults; (c)   verbal threats; (d)   stalking; (e)   harassment; (f)   theft; (g)   motor vehicle accidents; and (h)   homicide; and (2)   reported incidents of discriminatory speech or discriminatory conduct involving a driver who provided prearranged rides for, or a rider who received prearranged rides from, the transportation network company. 14.  (New section) a.  The commission shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    At a minimum, the rules and regulations shall: (1)   establish requirements and procedures for the audio and video recording of a prearranged ride, as provided by subsection a. of section 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), including: (a)   the deadline by which a driver shall equip the drivers personal vehicle with the audio and video recording capabilities; (b)   access to and encryption and storage of audio and video recordings, including measures to promote victim-survivor privacy and choice; (c)   procedures for transferring audio and video recordings and related data between a transportation network company and the driver, the rider, or both the driver and rider; (d)   education provided by a transportation network company to a driver and rider regarding the safety benefits of recording a prearranged ride; and (e)   technological failures related to audio and video recordings captured pursuant subsection a. of section 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), including rules that hold harmless a transportation network company for a technological failure outside of the transportation network companys control if the transportation network company is otherwise acting in good faith to record a prearranged ride; and (2)   govern a complainants access to the data collected by a transportation network company related to a complaint alleging a violation of the zero tolerance policy established by subsection a. of section 5 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 15.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month following enactment.  The commission shall take such anticipatory administrative action as shall be necessary to implement the provisions of this act.